New Jersey, session 221, S992.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  In accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to subsection c. of this section, the owner of an area of public assembly or service shall maintain an induction loop listening system, and shall post prominently-visible permanently-mounted signage to indicate to visitors that the induction loop listening system is available.  This requirement shall apply when, in association with a building permit application that is initially submitted following the effective date of this section, an area of public assembly or service is newly constructed or undergoes a substantial renovation.  Following initial installation, an owner of an area of public assembly or service for whom this section applies shall, on a biennial basis, complete a self-certification form and submit the form to the applicable code enforcing agency, attesting that the induction loop listening system continues to be functional. b.  In association with a building permit application, the permit applicant may assert that installation of an induction loop listening system would be impractical, and request that the enforcing agency reviewing the application evaluate that assertion.  Notwithstanding any provision of subsection a. of this section to the contrary, an owner of an area of public assembly or service shall not be required to install an induction loop listening system if the enforcing agency reviewing the application determines that the installation of an induction loop listening system would be impractical. c.     The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) in order to adjust the State Uniform Construction Code to effectuate the purposes of this section.  The rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, standards for: (1)  the installation of an induction loop listening system; (2) the conditions that would render the installation of an induction loop listening system impractical pursuant to subsection b. of this section; (3)  the placement and appearance of the required signage, using the ear-with-T logo; and (4)  the frequency and criteria of public access that shall cause a space to be designated as open to the public in relation to the definition of an area of public assembly or service. d.    As used in this section: Area of public assembly or service means a building or structure, or space within a building or structure, that is regularly open for public gatherings, including an auditorium, theater, meeting room, courtroom, community center, library, pharmacy counter, information desk at a medical facility, a waiting area for a medical office, bank teller area, car rental business, restaurant, bar, or other food or beverage counter service location, coat check area, grocery store check-out area, ticket payment location, or other category of space designated by the commissioner as an area of public assembly or service. Commissioner means the Commissioner of Community Affairs. Induction loop listening system means a hardwired assistive listening system through which a loop of wire around an area of a building produces a signal, or a hardwired countertop version that produces a signal, received directly by hearing aids and cochlear implants equipped with telecoil features used by persons with hearing loss. Substantial renovation means a construction or renovation project requiring a building permit and where the value of the renovation to the area of public assembly or service exceeds $40,000. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following enactment, but the Commissioner of Community Affairs may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of the act.